Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.32, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Private data; when disclosure is permitted. Except as provided in subdivision 5, educational data is private data on individuals and shall not be disclosed except as follows: (a) pursuant to section 13.05; (b) pursuant to a valid court order; (c) pursuant to a statute specifically authorizing access to the private data; (d) to disclose information in health, including mental health, and safety emergencies pursuant to the provisions of United States Code, title 20, section 1232g(b)(1)(I), and Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 99.36; (e) pursuant to the provisions of United States Code, title 20, sections 1232g(b)(1), (b)(4)(A), (b)(4)(B), (b)(1)(B), (b)(3), (b)(6), (b)(7), and (i), and Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, sections 99.31, 99.32, 99.33, 99.34, 99.35, and 99.39new text begin , except that no disclosure may be made pursuant to United States Code, title 20, section 1232g(b)(1)(J)(ii), or Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, subtitle A, section 99.31(a)(9)(i)-(ii), in the absence of a judicial order or judicially issued subpoenanew text end ; (f) to appropriate health authorities to the extent necessary to administer immunization programs and for bona fide epidemiologic investigations which the commissioner of health determines are necessary to prevent disease or disability to individuals in the public educational agency or institution in which the investigation is being conducted; (g) when disclosure is required for institutions that participate in a program under title IV of the Higher Education Act, United States Code, title 20, section 1092; (h) to the appropriate school district officials to the extent necessary under subdivision 6, annually to indicate the extent and content of remedial instruction, including the results of assessment testing and academic performance at a postsecondary institution during the previous academic year by a student who graduated from a Minnesota school district within two years before receiving the remedial instruction; (i) to appropriate authorities as provided in United States Code, title 20, section 1232g(b)(1)(E)(ii), if the data concern the juvenile justice system and the ability of the system to effectively serve, prior to adjudication, the student whose records are released; provided that the authorities to whom the data are released submit a written request for the data that certifies that the data will not be disclosed to any other person except as authorized by law without the written consent of the parent of the student and the request and a record of the release are maintained in the student's file; (j) to volunteers who are determined to have a legitimate educational interest in the data and who are conducting activities and events sponsored by or endorsed by the educational agency or institution for students or former students; (k) to provide student recruiting information, from educational data held by colleges and universities, as required by and subject to Code of Federal Regulations, title 32, section 216; (l) to the juvenile justice system if information about the behavior of a student who poses a risk of harm is reasonably necessary to protect the health or safety of the student or other individuals; (m) with respect to Social Security numbers of students in the adult basic education system, to Minnesota State Colleges and Universities and the Department of Employment and Economic Development for the purpose and in the manner described in section 124D.52, subdivision 7; (n) to the commissioner of education for purposes of an assessment or investigation of a report of alleged maltreatment of a student as mandated by chapter 260E. Upon request by the commissioner of education, data that are relevant to a report of maltreatment and are from charter school and school district investigations of alleged maltreatment of a student must be disclosed to the commissioner, includingdeleted text begin ,deleted text end but not limited todeleted text begin ,deleted text end the following: (1) information regarding the student alleged to have been maltreated; (2) information regarding student and employee witnesses; (3) information regarding the alleged perpetrator; and (4) what corrective or protective action was taken, if any, by the school facility in response to a report of maltreatment by an employee or agent of the school or school district; (o) when the disclosure is of the final results of a disciplinary proceeding on a charge of a crime of violence or nonforcible sex offense to the extent authorized under United States Code, title 20, section 1232g(b)(6)(A) and (B), and Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, sections 99.31(a)(13) and (14); (p) when the disclosure is information provided to the institution under United States Code, title 42, section 14071, concerning registered sex offenders to the extent authorized under United States Code, title 20, section 1232g(b)(7); (q) when the disclosure is to a parent of a student at an institution of postsecondary education regarding the student's violation of any federal, state, or local law or of any rule or policy of the institution, governing the use or possession of alcohol or of a controlled substance, to the extent authorized under United States Code, title 20, section 1232g(i), and Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 99.31(a)(15), and provided the institution has an information release form signed by the student authorizing disclosure to a parent. The institution must notify parents and students about the purpose and availability of the information release forms. At a minimum, the institution must distribute the information release forms at parent and student orientation meetings; (r) a student's name, home address, telephone number, email address, or other personal contact information may be disclosed to a public library for purposes of issuing a library card to the student; or (s) with federally recognized Tribal Nations about Tribally enrolled or descendant students to the extent necessary for the Tribal Nation and school district or charter school to support the educational attainment of the student. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 13.32, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Directory information; data on parents. (a) Educational data designated as directory information is public data on individuals to the extent required under federal law. Directory information must be designated pursuant to the provisions of: (1) this subdivision; and (2) United States Code, title 20, section 1232g, and Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 99.37, which were in effect on January 3, 2012. (b) When conducting the directory information designation and notice process required by federal law, an educational agency or institution shall give parents and students notice of the right to refuse to let the agency or institution designate specified data about the student as directory information. This notice may be given by any means reasonably likely to inform the parents and students of the right. (c) An educational agency or institution may not designate a student's or parent's home address, telephone number, email address, or other personal contact information as directory information under this subdivision. This paragraph does not apply to a postsecondary institution. (d) When requested, educational agencies or institutions must share personal student or parent contact information and directory information, whether public or private, with the Minnesota Department of Education, as required for federal reporting purposes. (e) When requested, and in accordance with requirements for parental consent in the Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 300.622 (b)(2), and part 99, educational agencies or institutions may share personal student or parent contact information and directory information for students served in special education with postsecondary transition planning and services under section 125A.08, paragraph (b), clause (1), whether public or private, with the Department of Employment and Economic Development, as required for coordination of services to students with disabilities under sections deleted text begin 125A.08, paragraph (b), clause (1); 125A.023; and 125A.027deleted text end new text begin 125A.023; 125A.027; and 125A.08, paragraph (b), clause (1)new text end . (f) Data concerning parents is private data on individuals but may be treated as directory information if the same procedures that are used by a school district to designate student data as directory information under this subdivision are followed, except that a parent's home address, telephone number, email address, or other personal contact information may not be treated as directory information under this subdivision. new text begin (g) An educational agency or institution may not designate as directory information data on individuals that indicates or otherwise has the effect of identifying that an individual is not a citizen or national of the United States, including the individual's status as an international student. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [135A.1455] LIMITS ON ACCESS BY FEDERAL IMMIGRATION OFFICERS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Applicability. new text end new text begin This section applies to: (1) public postsecondary institutions governed by either the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities or the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota; and (2) private postsecondary institutions that offer in-person courses on a campus located in Minnesota and that are eligible institutions as defined in section 136A.103, subdivision 1, paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "federal immigration officer" means a person acting in their official capacity as an officer or employee of a United States agency that enforces civil immigration law, including but not limited to United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement and United States Customs and Border Protection. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Limits on access. new text end new text begin (a) Except as required by state or federal law or as required to administer a state or federally supported educational program, an official, staff member, or other employee of a postsecondary institution must not allow a federal immigration officer to enter the institution's campus for any purpose unless the officer provides valid identification, a written statement of purpose, and a valid warrant issued by a state or federal judge or a federal magistrate judge that authorizes access to the campus. new text end new text begin (b) If a federal immigration officer requests entrance to or is found present on the campus of a postsecondary institution, an official, staff member, or other employee of the postsecondary institution must notify: (1) the chief administrative official of the public postsecondary system, if the institution is a public postsecondary institution; or (2) the president of the postsecondary institution, if the institution is a private postsecondary institution. A chief administrative official or president may designate another school official, staff member, or employee to receive this notification on their behalf. new text end new text begin (c) If a federal immigration officer meets the requirements of paragraph (a), the public postsecondary institution must limit the officer's access to only the places, times, and individuals authorized under the judicial warrant. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end